Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5944YH (2) 91 ms/js H.F. 2424 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 331.351 Settlement agreements. 1 1. The county may enter a settlement agreement that resolves 2 a legal dispute claiming monetary damages, equitable relief, 3 or a violation of a rule or statute. The board shall publish 4 a notice of the time and place of a public hearing on the 5 settlement no less than four nor more than twenty days before 6 the hearing. The board may approve the settlement agreement 7 at the public hearing. 8 2. The county shall not implement the settlement agreement 9 or make any payments pursuant to the settlement agreement until 10 the agreement has been approved by the board at the public 11 hearing. 12 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 364.26 Settlement agreements. 13 1. The city may enter a settlement agreement that resolves 14 a legal dispute claiming monetary damages, equitable relief, 15 or a violation of a rule or statute. The council shall 16 publish notice of the time and place of a public hearing on the 17 settlement no less than four nor more than twenty days before 18 the hearing. The council may approve the settlement agreement 19 at the public hearing. 20 2. The city shall not implement the settlement agreement or 21 make any payments pursuant to the settlement agreement until 22 the agreement has been approved by the council at the public 23 hearing. 24